Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-212
Private seals; use abolished.

The use of private seals upon all deeds, mortgages, leases, bonds, and other instruments and contracts in writing, is abolished, and the addition of a private seal to any such instrument or contract in writing shall not affect its equity or legality in any respect.

R.S.1866, c. 49, § 1, p. 376;

R.S.1913, § 6251;

C.S.1922, § 5650;

C.S.1929, § 76-256;

R.S.1943, § 76-212.

Since abolishment of private seals, all contracts are simple contracts. Montgomery v. Dresher, 90 Neb. 632, 134 N.W. 251 (1912).

Private seals do not affect the equity or legality of written instruments or contracts in this state. Fitzgerald v. Union Stock Yds. Co., 89 Neb. 393, 131 N.W. 612 (1911).

Abolishment of seals abolished their incidents, i.e., conclusive presumption of consideration. Luce v. Foster, 42 Neb. 818, 60 N.W. 1027 (1894); Richardson v. Woodruff, 20 Neb. 132, 29 N.W. 308 (1886).